Utah statutes.
76-6-1004.   Presumptions and defenses.
(1)  The presumptions and defenses regarding the theft of property in Section
76-6-402 apply to this part, in addition to the provisions of this section.
(2)  It is a defense to a charge of mail theft that:
(a)  the defendant was unaware that the mail belonged to another person;
(b)  the defendant reasonably believed he was entitled to the mail or had a
right to acquire or dispose of the mail as he did; or
(c)  the mail belonged to the defendant's spouse, unless the parties were
either legally separated or living in separate residences at the time of the
alleged mail theft.
